District of Columbia statutes.
36-406

Statute of limitations.

An action for misappropriation must be brought within 3 years after the misappropriation is discovered or, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, should have been discovered. For the purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation constitutes a single claim.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-216, § 7, 36 DCR 519

History

1981 Ed., § 48-506.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.

Editor's Notes